Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,165.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2,165 to 81-2,180 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Apiary Act.

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 54;

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 3.